Maryland, session 2025, SB0994.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
SUBTITLE 9. MISCELLANEOUS.
5–901.
A PERSON MAY NOT BE DENIED THE RIGHT TO PURCHASE, OWN, POSSESS, OR
CARRY A FIREARM UNDER THIS TITLE SOLELY ON THE BASIS THAT THE PERSON IS
AUTHORIZED TO USE MEDICAL CANNABIS UNDER TITLE 36, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0994*